src-fst-affixes-propernouns.lexc.md
# Proper noun inflection

Komi proper nouns inflect in the same cases as regular
nouns.

## Temporary lexica

LEXICON ACRON-F 

LEXICON ACRON 

LEXICON PROP-RUS_ 
LEXICON PROP_ 


## Russian type Surnames 

Preparing for the template urj-Cyrl
Beginning 2012-11-15
LEXICON CYRL-CONS_SUR 

LEXICON CYRL-SIBILANT_SUR 

LEXICON CYRL-VOW_SUR 

LEXICON CYRL-A_SUR 

LEXICON CYRL-K_SUR 

LEXICON CYRL-L_SUR 
* :2 PropSur-kal ;  These are foreign Л words

LEXICON CYRL-T_SUR 

* LEXICON PROP_KUDO_SURFEM  giella-shared

LEXICON Deriv-RUS-AN_SURMAL 

Абдеев:Абдеев
LEXICON Deriv-RUS-V_SURMAL 

Багрий:Багр
LEXICON Deriv-RUS-IJ_SURMAL 

LEXICON Deriv-RUS-IN_SURMAL 

Аморский:Аморск
LEXICON Deriv-RUS-KIJ_SURMAL 

LEXICON Deriv-RUS-OJ_SURMAL 

LEXICON Deriv-RUS-YJ_SURMAL 

## PLACE NAMES FROM TEMPLATES 

LEXICON PROP-PLC_KAL 

LEXICON PROP-PLC_KIT 

LEXICON PROP-PLC_KUDO 


These are vowel-final stems
They have previously received +Sem/Fem tags








## Male given name for deriving patronyms 
Should this be limited to +Sg? 2015-09-06

Вили:Вил




Андрей:Андре













Ending 2012-11-15









FEMALE NAMES FROM TEMPLATE

## PLACE NAMES FROM TEMPLATES 


* **@U.Cap.Opt@+Sg:@U.Cap.Opt@ DENOMINAL-LOCATIVE-ADJECTIVES ; ** This requires down-casing


* **@U.Cap.Opt@+Sem/Plc+EOLang/KPV+Sg:@U.Cap.Opt@ DENOMINAL-LOCATIVE-ADJECTIVES ; ** This requires down-casing
























* * *
<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [../src/fst/affixes/propernouns.lexc](http://github.com/giellalt/lang-kpv/blob/main/../src/fst/affixes/propernouns.lexc)</small>
